District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.326

Limitation on duplicative projects.

(a)

The grant-managing entity shall take steps to avoid awarding subgrants to a nonprofit that has been awarded or is being awarded funds from another District agency for the same or similar program purposes for which it is applying for funding from the Fund.

(b)

Within 30 days after the effective date of the MOU, the grant-managing entity shall provide to the Department of Health and the Council a plan that sets forth procedures for avoiding the award of duplicative funds.

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 5147, 61 DCR 9990